Washington statutes.
RCW 18.270.070

Violations—Investigations.

An authorized representative of the director must investigate alleged violations of this chapter. Upon request of an authorized representative, a person performing fire protection sprinkler fitting or residential sprinkler fitting work must produce evidence of a certificate issued by the director in accordance with this chapter. Failure to produce such evidence is an infraction as provided by RCW 18.270.020.

[ 2023 c 329 s 6; 2007 c 435 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 329: See note following RCW 18.160.030.